Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 4. Protection of Property of Persons Under Disability and Minors.

Sec. 13.26.401.
Protective proceedings.

Upon petition and after notice and hearing in accordance with the provisions of AS

13.26.401

—

13.26.575

, the court may appoint a conservator or issue another protective order for cause as follows:

appointment of a conservator or other protective order may be made in relation to the estate and affairs of a minor if the court determines that

a minor owns money or property that requires management or protection that cannot otherwise be provided;

the minor has or may have business affairs that may be jeopardized or prevented by the status of being a minor; or

funds are needed for the minor’s support and education and protection is necessary or desirable to obtain or provide funds;

appointment of a conservator or other protective order may be made in relation to the estate and affairs of a person if the court determines that

the person is unable to manage the person’s property and affairs effectively for reasons such as mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness or disability, advanced age, chronic use of drugs, chronic intoxication, fraud, confinement, detention by a foreign power, or disappearance; and

the person has property that will be wasted or dissipated unless proper management is provided, or that funds are needed for the support, care, and welfare of the person or those entitled to be supported by the person and protection is necessary or desirable to obtain or provide funds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.165

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.401

—

13.26.575

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.165

—

13.26.315

”.

Sec. 13.26.406.
Protective proceedings; jurisdiction of affairs of protected persons.

Except as otherwise provided under AS

13.27.110

, after the service of notice in a proceeding seeking the appointment of a conservator or other protective order and until termination of the proceeding, the court in which the petition is filed has exclusive jurisdiction to determine

the need for a conservator or other protective order until the proceedings are terminated; and

how the estate of the protected person that is subject to the laws of this state shall be managed, expended, or distributed to or for the use of the protected person or any of the person’s dependents.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 21 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.170

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.410.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.750.]

Sec. 13.26.411.
Venue.

Venue for proceedings under AS

13.26.401

—

13.26.575

is

in the place in this state where the person to be protected resides whether or not a guardian has been appointed in another place; or

if the person to be protected does not reside in this state, in any place where the person has property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.175

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.401

—

13.26.575

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.165

—

13.26.315

”.

Sec. 13.26.415.
Original petition for appointment or protective order.

The person to be protected, a person’s attorney or other legal representative, any person who is interested in the estate, affairs, or welfare of the person to be protected, including a parent, guardian, custodian, or caregiver, the Department of Health and Social Services, or any person who would be adversely affected by lack of effective management of the property and affairs of the person to be protected, may petition for the appointment of a conservator or for other appropriate protective order.

The petition must set out to the extent known, the interest of the petitioner; the name, age, residence and address of the person to be protected; the name and address of the person’s guardian, if any; the name and address of the person’s nearest relative known to the petitioner; a general statement of the person’s property with an estimate of its value, including any compensation, insurance, pension or allowance to which the person is entitled; and the reason why appointment of a conservator or other protective order is necessary. If the appointment of a conservator is requested, the petition also must set out the name and address of the person whose appointment is sought and the basis of priority for appointment.

The petition may include a request for temporary conservatorship as provided in AS

13.26.445

if it appears that the respondent’s property is likely to be wasted or dissipated during the pendency of the conservatorship proceeding. A request for temporary conservatorship must specify the facts that cause the petitioner to believe that a temporary conservatorship is necessary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am §§ 7, 8 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.180; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.445

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.206”.

Sec. 13.26.420.
Notice.

On a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order, the person to be protected and the person’s spouse or, if none, the person’s parents, must be served personally, by certified mail, or by any other method authorized by court rule with notice of the proceedings at least 14 days before the date of hearing if they can be found within the state, or, if they cannot be found within the state, they must be given notice in accordance with AS

13.06.110

. Waiver by the person to be protected is not effective unless the person to be protected attends the hearing or, unless minority is the reason for the proceeding, waiver is confirmed in an interview with the visitor.

Notice of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other initial protective order, and of any subsequent hearing, must be given to any person who has filed a request for notice under AS

13.26.425

and to interested persons and other persons as the court may direct. Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this section, notice shall be given in accordance with AS

13.06.110

.

This section does not apply to a petition or order for an ex parte protective order filed under AS

13.26.450

or a temporary protective order filed under AS

13.26.455

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 22 ch 53 SLA 2008; am § 9 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.185

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.425

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.190

”, “AS

13.26.450

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.207”, and “AS

13.26.455

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.208”.

Sec. 13.26.425.
Protective proceedings; request for notice; interested person.

Any interested person who desires to be notified before any order is made in a protective proceeding may file with the registrar a request for notice subsequent to payment of any fee required by statute or court rule.
The clerk shall mail a copy of the demand to the conservator if one has been appointed.
A request is not effective unless it contains a statement showing the interest of the person making it and the person’s address, or that of the person’s attorney, and is effective only as to matters occurring after the filing.
Any governmental agency paying or planning to pay benefits to the person to be protected is an interested person in protective proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.190

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.430.
Procedure concerning hearing and order on original petition.

Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order because of minority, the court shall set a date for hearing on the matters alleged in the petition. If, at any time in the proceeding, the court determines that the interests of the minor are or may be inadequately represented, it may appoint an attorney to represent the minor, giving consideration to the choice of the minor if 14 years of age or older. A lawyer appointed by the court to represent a minor has the powers and duties of a guardian ad litem.

Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order for reasons other than minority, the court shall set a date for hearing. Unless the person to be protected has counsel of the person’s own choice, the court must appoint a lawyer to represent the person. If the alleged disability is mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness or disability, advanced age, chronic use of drugs, or chronic intoxication, the court may direct that the person to be protected be examined by a physician designated by the court, preferably a physician who is not connected with any institution in which the person is a patient or is detained. The court may send a visitor to interview the person to be protected. The visitor may be a guardian ad litem or an officer or employee of the court.

After hearing, upon finding that a basis for the appointment of a conservator or other protective order has been established, the court shall make an appointment or other appropriate protective order.

The court shall investigate alternatives to a conservator and the use of a special conservator as provided in AS

13.26.440(c)

. A conservator may be appointed only if a less restrictive protective order or the services of a special conservator are not adequate to protect the estate of the protected person. The court shall, to the extent possible, consult with the protected person in determining what action should be taken.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 15 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 20 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1972.

Formerly AS 13.26.195; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.440(c)

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.205(c)”.

Sec. 13.26.435.
Permissible court orders.

The court has the following powers which may be exercised directly or through a conservator in respect to the estate and affairs of protected persons:

while a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order is pending and after preliminary hearing and without notice to others, the court has power to preserve and apply the property of the person to be protected as may be required for the person’s benefit or the benefit of the person’s dependents;

after hearing and upon determining that a basis for an appointment or other protective order exists with respect to a minor without other disability, the court has all those powers over the estate and affairs of the minor which are or might be necessary for the best interests of the minor, the minor’s family and members of the minor’s household;

after hearing and upon determining that a basis for an appointment or other protective order exists with respect to a person for reasons other than minority, the court has, for the benefit of the person and members of the person’s household, all the powers over the person’s estate and affairs which the person could exercise if present and not under disability, except the power to make a will; these powers include, but are not limited to, power to make gifts, to convey or release contingent and expectant interests in property including marital property rights and any right of survivorship incident to joint tenancy or tenancy by the entirety, to exercise or release powers as trustee, personal representative, custodian for minors, conservator, or donee of a power of appointment, to enter into contracts, to create revocable or irrevocable trusts of property of the estate which may extend beyond the person’s disability or life, to exercise options of the disabled person to purchase securities or other property, to exercise rights to elect options and change beneficiaries under insurance and annuity policies and to surrender the policies for their cash value, to exercise the right to an elective share in the estate of a deceased spouse, and to renounce any interest by testate or intestate succession or by inter vivos transfer;

the court may exercise, or direct the exercise of its authority to exercise or release powers of appointment of which the protected person is donee, to renounce interests, to make gifts in trust or otherwise exceeding 20 percent of any year’s income of the estate, or to change beneficiaries under insurance and annuity policies, only if satisfied, after notice and hearing, that it is in the best interests of the protected person, and that the protected person either is incapable of consenting or has consented to the proposed exercise of power;

an order made pursuant to this section determining that a basis for appointment of a conservator or other protective order exists, has no effect on the capacity of the protected person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.200; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.440.
Protective arrangements and single transactions authorized.

If it is established in a proper proceeding that a basis exists as described in AS

13.26.401

for affecting the property and affairs of a person the court, without appointing a conservator, may authorize, direct, or ratify any transaction necessary or desirable to achieve any security, service, or care arrangement meeting the foreseeable needs of the protected person. Protective arrangements include, but are not limited to, payment, delivery, deposit, or retention of funds or property, sale, mortgage, lease, or other transfer of property, entry into an annuity contract, a contract for life care, a deposit contract, a contract for training and education, or addition to or establishment of a suitable trust.

When it has been established in a proper proceeding that a basis exists as described in AS

13.26.401

for affecting the property and affairs of a person the court, without appointing a conservator, may authorize, direct, or ratify any contract, trust, or other transaction relating to the protected person’s financial affairs or involving the person’s estate if the court determines that the transaction is in the best interests of the protected person.

Before approving a protective arrangement or other transaction under this section, the court shall consider the interests of creditors and dependents of the protected person and, in view of the protected person’s disability, whether the protected person needs the continuing protection of a conservator. If only certain powers need be given to the conservator or the services of a conservator are needed only for a limited number of transactions, a special conservator may be appointed. The court may appoint a special conservator to assist in the accomplishment of any protective arrangement or other transaction authorized under this section who shall have the authority conferred by the order and serve until discharged by order after report to the court of all matters carried out under the order of appointment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 16 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.205

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.401

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.165

”.

Sec. 13.26.445.
Temporary conservators.

If, during the pendency of an initial petition for conservatorship, it appears that the respondent is in need of a protective order to protect the respondent against waste or dissipation of funds or property, or to obtain funds that are needed for the immediate support, care, and welfare of the respondent or persons entitled to be supported by the respondent, and the respondent is not capable of protecting the respondent’s funds or property or obtaining the funds that are needed to support the respondent or persons whom the respondent is required to support, the petitioner may request the appointment of a temporary conservator to authorize the protection or to obtain the necessary funds. The request must state the reasons and factual basis for the request. The petitioner shall immediately file the request with the court and serve copies on the respondent and the respondent’s attorney and other persons as ordered by the court. The court shall appoint an attorney for a respondent who is unrepresented to be at the hearing and conduct a hearing within 72 hours after the filing.

If the court determines that a temporary conservator should be appointed, it shall make the appointment and grant to the temporary conservator only the authority that is least restrictive upon the liberty of the respondent and that enables the temporary conservator to provide the protection or authority necessary to protect the respondent from waste or dissipation of funds or property or to obtain the funds necessary for support.

The temporary conservatorship expires at the time of the appointment of a full or partial conservator or on the dismissal of the petition for conservatorship.

History.

(§ 10 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.206; renumbered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Rule 77, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 48(c), ch. 71, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 13.26.450.
Ex parte protective orders.

A person who is allowed to file a petition for a protective order under AS

13.26.415(a)

may file a petition for an ex parte protective order against a person other than the protected person. A petition filed on behalf of a protected person by a person other than the protected person must be accompanied by proof of service of the petition on the protected person or the person’s attorney unless service would cause an immediate threat of harm to the best interests of the protected person and the petition includes a written explanation of the harm. If the court finds that the petition establishes probable cause that the respondent is financially defrauding the petitioner or a person for whose benefit the petitioner filed the petition and that, because of the fraud, there has been or is an immediate threat of a waste or dissipation of the proposed protected person’s funds or other property, the court shall ex parte and without notice to the respondent issue a protective order. The petitioner shall certify to the court in writing any effort that the petitioner made to provide notice to the respondent.

An ex parte protective order under this section may

grant any protection described in AS

13.26.435

;

supersede an existing power of attorney;

prohibit the respondent from having any direct or indirect contact with the petitioner or other person for whose benefit the petitioner filed the petition; and

prohibit the respondent from taking any act with respect to the funds or other property of the petitioner or other person for whose benefit the petitioner filed the petition.

An ex parte protective order expires 20 days after it is issued, unless dissolved earlier by the court at the request of the petitioner or respondent and after notice and, if requested, a hearing, or on the earlier appointment of a temporary or permanent conservator.

History.

(§ 10 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.207; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.415(a)

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.180(a)” and “AS

13.26.435

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.200”.

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Rule 17, Alaska Rules of Probate Procedure, see § 48(a), ch. 71, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 13.26.455.
Temporary protective orders; conversions.

On application filed with the court before the expiration of a 20-day ex parte protective order issued under AS

13.26.450

, the court shall schedule a hearing on whether to convert the protective order to a temporary order effective for up to six months. The court shall provide to the protected person and the respondent at least 10 days’ notice of the hearing and the respondent’s right to appear and be heard. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the respondent has committed fraud against the petitioner or the person for whose benefit the petition was filed, regardless of whether the respondent appears at the hearing, the court may convert the ex parte protective order to a temporary protective order effective for up to six months.

History.

(§ 10 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.208; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.450

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.207”.

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Rule 17, Alaska Rules of Probate Procedure, and Rule 77, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 48(a) and (d), ch. 71, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 13.26.460.
Protective orders; modification; third-party compliance; forms; fees.

The petitioner, respondent, or protected person, if the protected person is a vulnerable adult, may request modification of a protective order issued under AS

13.26.450

—

13.26.460

. Except as provided in (b) of this section, if a request is made for modification of

an ex parte protective order issued under AS

13.26.450

, the court shall schedule a hearing on three days’ notice or on shorter notice as the court may prescribe; or

a temporary protective order, after notice and hearing under AS

13.26.455

, the court shall schedule a hearing within 20 days after the date the request is made, except that, if the court finds that the request is meritless on its face, the court may deny the request without a hearing.

If a request for a modification is made under this section and the respondent raises an issue not raised by the petitioner, the court may allow the petitioner additional time to respond.

If the court modifies a protective order, the court shall issue a modified order and shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the order is understood by the petitioner, the respondent, and the protected person who are present at the hearing.

The court shall cause a copy of a protective order, any related orders, and a scheduling order, if any, to be served on the respondent and the protected person and have a protective order and any related order delivered to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for expedited entry in the central registry under AS

18.65.540

.

A protective order issued under AS

13.26.450

—

13.26.460

is in addition to any other civil or criminal remedy.

A third party that has received actual or legal notice of a protective order issued under AS

13.26.450

—

13.26.460

shall comply with the order. A third party who does not comply with a protective order granted under AS

13.26.450

—

13.26.460

may be liable in a civil action to the protected person or the protected person’s heirs, assigns, or estate for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000, plus the actual damages, costs, and fees associated with the failure to comply with the protective order. A third party who does not comply with a protective order granted under AS 13.26.450 — 13.26.460 may also be criminally liable under AS

11.56.740

for violating a protective order. As used in this section, “actual or legal notice” means delivery by mail or facsimile at the most recently known place of residence or business of the third party.

The Alaska Court System, after consulting with the Department of Health and Social Services, the office of public advocacy, the office of elder fraud and assistance, the long term care ombudsman, and other interested persons and organizations, shall prepare forms for petitions and protective orders and instructions for use of the forms by a person seeking a protective order under AS

13.26.450

—

13.26.460

. The forms must conform to the Alaska Rules of Probate Procedure and Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, except that information on the forms may be filled in by legible handwriting. The office of the clerk of each superior and district court shall make available to the public the forms a person seeking a protective order may need and instructions for the use of the forms. The clerk shall provide assistance in completing and filing the forms.

Filing fees may not be charged for a petition under AS

13.26.450

, for an application under AS

13.26.455

, or for a request for modification of a protective order under AS

13.26.460(a)

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.209; renumbered in 2016 at which time numerous cross references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Rule 17, Alaska Rules of Probate Procedure, Rule 9, Alaska Rules of Administration, and Rule 77, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 48(a), (b), and (e), ch. 71, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 13.26.465.
Who may be appointed conservator; priorities.

The court may appoint a competent person, including a private professional conservator, private professional full guardian under AS

08.26.020

, or the public guardian, as the conservator of the estate of a protected person.

The court may not appoint a person to be a conservator of a protected person if the person

provides, or is likely to provide during the conservatorship, substantial services to the protected person in a professional or business capacity, other than in the capacity of conservator;

is or is likely to become, during the conservatorship, a creditor of the protected person, other than in the capacity of conservator;

is likely to have, during the conservatorship, interests that may conflict with those of the protected person; or

is employed by a person who would be disqualified under (1) — (3) of this subsection.

A person may be appointed as the conservator of a protected person even if (b) of this section applies if the person is the spouse, adult child, parent, or sibling of the protected person and if the court determines that the potential conflict of interest is not substantial and that the appointment would clearly be in the best interests of the protected person.

Subject to (e) and (f) of this section, qualified persons have priority for appointment in the following order:

an individual or qualified conservator nominated by the protected person if the protected person is 14 or more years of age and had, in the opinion of the court, sufficient mental capacity to make an informed choice;

the spouse of the protected person;

an adult child or a parent of the protected person;

a relative of the protected person with whom the protected person has resided for more than six months during the year before the filing of the petition;

a relative or friend of the protected person who has demonstrated a sincere and longstanding interest in the welfare of the protected person;

a private professional conservator;

the public guardian.

When more than one person has equal priority under (d) of this section, the court shall select the person it considers to be the best qualified.

When in the best interest of the protected person, a court may decline to appoint a person who has priority under (d) of this section as conservator of the protected person and may appoint as conservator a person who has a lower priority than another person or who does not have a priority. If the court appoints a person with a lower priority under (d) of this section than another person, the court shall make appropriate written findings related to why the best interests of the respondent require appointment of the person with a lower priority.

In addition to any other requirement of this section, when appointing a relative or friend of the protected person as the conservator of the protected person, the court shall require that the proposed conservator complete one hour of mandatory education on the basics of conservatorship before the appointment or within 30 days after the appointment. If the person is appointed based on the person’s agreement to complete the mandatory education and the person fails to complete the mandatory education within the 30 days, the court shall remove the conservator and appoint a successor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 21 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 20 ch 56 SLA 2005; am §§ 23, 24 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.210; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.470.
Bond.

The court may require a conservator to furnish a bond conditioned upon faithful discharge of all duties of the trust according to law, with sureties as it shall specify. Unless otherwise directed, the bond shall be in the amount of the aggregate capital value of the property of the estate in the conservator’s control plus one year’s estimated income minus the value of securities deposited under arrangements requiring an order of the court for their removal and the value of any land which the fiduciary, by express limitation of power, lacks power to sell or convey without court authorization. The court in place of sureties on a bond, may accept other security for the performance of the bond, including a pledge of securities or a mortgage of land.

If the public guardian is appointed as a conservator, the court may not require a bond under this section.

If the court requires a conservator to provide a bond under this section and the conservator is financially unable to provide the bond, the court may order the cost of the bond to be paid from court funds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 17 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (b) and (c) enacted as AS 13.26.218. Renumbered in 1981.

Formerly AS

13.26.215

; renumbered in 2016. Subsections (b) and (c) were originally enacted as AS 13.26.218, and renumbered as former AS

13.26.215

(b) and (c) in 1981.

Sec. 13.26.475.
Terms and requirements of bonds.

The following requirements and provisions apply to any bond required under AS

13.26.470

:

unless otherwise provided by the terms of the approved bond, sureties are jointly and severally liable with the conservator and with each other;

by executing an approved bond of a conservator, the surety consents to the jurisdiction of the court which issued letters to the primary obligor in any proceeding pertaining to the fiduciary duties of the conservator and naming the surety as a party defendant; notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the surety or mailed by registered or certified mail to the surety at the address as listed with the court where the bond is filed and to the surety’s address as then known to the petitioner;

on petition of a successor conservator or any interested person, a proceeding may be initiated against a surety for breach of the obligation of the bond of the conservator;

the bond of the conservator is not void after the first recovery but may be proceeded against from time to time until the whole penalty is exhausted.

A proceeding may not be commenced against the surety on any matter as to which an action or proceeding against the primary obligor is barred by adjudication or limitation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.220

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.470

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.215

”.

Sec. 13.26.480.
Acceptance of appointment; consent to jurisdiction; notice.

By accepting appointment, a conservator submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the estate that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the conservator, or mailed by registered or certified mail to the conservator at the address as listed in the petition for appointment or as thereafter reported to the court and to the conservator’s address as then known to the petitioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.225

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.485.
Compensation and expenses.

If not otherwise compensated for services rendered, any visitor, lawyer, physician, conservator, or special conservator appointed in a protective proceeding is entitled to reasonable compensation from the estate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.230

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.490.
Death, resignation, or removal of conservator.

The court may remove a conservator for good cause, upon notice and hearing, or accept the resignation of a conservator. After death, resignation, or removal, the court may appoint another conservator.
A conservator so appointed succeeds to the title and powers of the conservator’s predecessor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.235

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.495.
Petitions for orders subsequent to appointment.

Any person interested in the welfare of a person for whom a conservator has been appointed may file a petition in the appointing court for an order

requiring bond or security or additional bond or security, or reducing bond;

requiring an accounting for the administration of the trust;

directing distribution;

removing the conservator and appointing a temporary or successor conservator; or

granting other appropriate relief.

A conservator may petition the appointing court for instructions concerning the fiduciary responsibility of the conservator.

Upon notice and hearing, the court may give appropriate instructions or make any appropriate order.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.240

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.500.
General duty of conservator.

In the exercise of powers, a conservator shall act as fiduciary and shall observe the standards of care applicable to trustees under AS

13.36.225

—

13.36.290

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS

13.36.225

—

13.36.290

” was substituted for “AS 13.36.200 —

13.36.275

” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of those sections.

Formerly AS

13.26.245

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.505.
Inventory, implementation report, and records.

Within 90 days after distribution of the order of appointment, every conservator shall prepare and file with the appointing court a conservator implementation report and a complete inventory of the estate of the protected person together with an oath or affirmation that it is complete and accurate so far as the conservator is informed. The conservator shall provide a copy of it to the protected person if the protected person can be located, has attained the age of 14 years, and has sufficient mental capacity to understand these matters, and to any parent or guardian with whom the protected person resides. The conservator shall keep suitable records of the administration and exhibit them on request of any interested person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 22 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.250

; renumbered in 2016.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 32(c), ch. 84, SLA 2004, provides that this section “as amended by sec. 22 of this Act, has the effect of changing Rule 17(e), Alaska Rules of Probate Procedure, by changing when a report is due and by adding additional material to be included in the report.”

Sec. 13.26.510.
Accounts.

A conservator shall submit a report to the court at least every year. In addition, a conservator shall account to the court for administration of the trust upon resignation or removal and at other times as the court may direct. On termination of the protected person’s minority or disability, a conservator may account to the court or to the former protected person or the protected person’s personal representative. Subject to appeal or vacation within the time permitted, an order, made upon notice and hearing, allowing an intermediate account of a conservator, adjudicates as to the conservator’s liabilities concerning the matters considered in connection with it; and an order, made upon notice and hearing, allowing a final account, adjudicates as to all previously unsettled liabilities of the conservator to the protected person or the protected person’s successors relating to the conservatorship. In connection with any account, the court may require a conservator to submit to a physical check of the estate in the conservator’s control, to be made in any manner the court may specify.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 23 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.255

; renumbered in 2016.